Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 7
DELIVERY OF ELECTION RETURNS

1-7-701. Delivery of election returns, ballot boxes, and other election papers.

When all the votes have been read and counted, the election judges selected in accordance with section 1-6-109.5 shall deliver to the designated election official the certificate and statement required by section 1-7-601, ballot boxes and all keys to the boxes, paper tapes, "proms" or other electronic devices, the registration records, pollbooks, accounting forms, spoiled ballots, unused ballots, ballot stubs, oaths, affidavits, and other election papers and supplies. The delivery must be made at once and with all convenient speed, and informality in the delivery does not invalidate the vote of any precinct when delivery has been made previous to the completion of the official abstract of the votes by the board of canvassers. The designated election official shall give a receipt for all items delivered.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 751, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 586, § 27, effective April 30.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 581, § 47, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-601 as it existed prior to 1992.